Hawaii statutes.
§138-10 Database or location
information. (a) Any communications service location information obtained
by any public safety answering point or public safety agency or its personnel
for public safety purposes is not a government record open to disclosure under
chapter 92F.

(b) A person shall not disclose or use, for
any purpose other than the enhanced 911 calling system, information contained
in the database of the communications service provider's network portion of the
enhanced 911 calling system established pursuant to this chapter, without the
prior written consent of the communications service provider. [L 2004, c 159,
pt of §2; am L 2011, c 168, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next